Washington statutes.
RCW 4.24.235

Physicians—Immunity from liability regarding safety belts.

A licensed physician shall not be liable for civil damages resulting directly or indirectly from providing, or refusing to provide, a written verification that a person under that physician's care us [is] unable to wear an automotive safety belt.

[ 1986 c 152 s 2.]

NOTES:

Safety belts, use required: RCW 46.61.688.